Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2802
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Municipal Proprietary Function Act is to require municipal governing bodies of cities of all classes and villages to follow prescribed procedures and make available to the public pertinent financial information with regard to functions of municipal government which generate revenue and expend funds based largely on customer demand.

Laws 1993, LB 734, § 2.